District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0553.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may
be cited as the "D.C. State Board of Education Expanded Authority Amendment Act of 2025".
Sec. 2. Section 403 of the Public Education Reform Amendment Act of2007 (D.C. Law
17-9, D.C. Official Code § 38-2652) is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (c)(l) is amended by inserting the phrase "by majority vote, or amendment
by two-thirds majority vote" after the word "approval";
(b) A new subsection (c-1) is inserted to read as follows:
"(c-1)(1) The State Board may initiate the submission of a policy action concerning a
matter enumerated in subsection (a) of this section as follows:
"(A)(i) The State Board shall formally request the submission of a
specified policy action concerning a matter enumerated in subsection (a) of this section by
transmitting a letter signed by five or more board members as signatories.


“(ii) The DC government entity from which the policy
action was requested has 90 days to respond to the written request from the State Board, and
shall inform the State Board whether they will commence the requested policy action within six
months, and to provide a written work plan detailing the timeline for submission of the requested
policy action.
“(B) If the relevant DC government entity does not respond within 90
days, declines the request of the State Board, does not initiate the process within six months, then
the State Board has the authority to require that the government entity initiate the policy through
a resolution, approved by a supermajority of two-thirds of members.
“(C) The resolution may require that the relevant DC government entity
initiate the policy within six months of transmission to the entity, and may require the relevant
DC government entity to submit the policy to the State Board for approval within one year of the
adoption of the resolution.”.
(2) The State Board may require education-related data from a DC government
entity, within the Executive Branch, to be submitted to the State Board as follows:
“(A) The State Board shall request the submission of education-related
data by transmitting a letter signed by five or more board members as signatories.
“(B) If the relevant DC government entity does not provide the data within
15 business days, or if the education agency declines the request, then the State Board has the
authority to require that the data be submitted to the Board, by a state resolution of the Board,
which requires a supermajority of members, within at least 15 days of transmission to the
agency.


“(C) This subsection shall not be interpreted to preclude a DC government
entity from voluntary submitting education-related data requested by the State Board of
Education or its individual members.”.
(b) A new subsection (f) is inserted to read as follows:
“(f)(1) The issues and concerns raised in the recommendations of a state resolution
adopted by the State Board of Education shall be given great weight during the deliberations by
the government entity. Great weight requires acknowledgement of the State Board as the source
of the recommendations and explicit reference to each of the State Board’s issues and concerns.
“(2) In all cases the government entity is required to articulate its decision in
writing. The written rationale of the decision shall articulate with particularity and precision the
reasons why the State Board does or does not offer persuasive advice under the circumstances. In
so doing, the government entity must articulate specific findings and conclusions with respect to
each issue and concern raised by the State Board. Further, the government entity is required to
support its position on the record.
“(3) The government entity shall promptly send to the State Board a copy of its
written decision within 60 days.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the


Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.